Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 2
CAPITAL REQUIREMENTS

11-103-201. Capital.

The banking board shall establish by rule the capital standards and guidelines, the methods for measuring capital, and the definitions of "capital", "capital adequacy", "capital inadequacy", and other related terms for banks subject to this code, that may differ for specific purposes. In promulgating such rules, the banking board shall consider all relevant factors, including, without limitation, the policies set forth in section 11-101-102 and relevant federal laws and rules. Each bank subject to this code shall at all times comply with the capital rules promulgated by the banking board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1081, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-202. Inadequacy of capital - assessments.

If the banking board has reason to believe that the capital of any bank is inadequate under the rules of the banking board, the banking board may ascertain the facts and furnish the bank with a copy of its determination. If the banking board determines an inadequacy of capital based upon such determination, the commissioner, with the approval of the banking board, may direct the state bank to levy an assessment in a designated amount upon the holders of record of common stock to remedy an inadequacy of capital. Upon receipt of an order to levy an assessment, the directors shall cause to be sent to all holders of common stock, at their addresses, a copy of the order and a copy of this subsection (1). If an assessment is not paid within the time prescribed in the order or such shorter period as the directors decide, but not less than thirty days, the state bank may, within sixty days thereafter as the banking board may prescribe in its order, offer the shares of the defaulting stockholders for sale at public auction or private sale at a price that shall not be less than the amount of the assessment and the cost of the sale. Any excess shall be paid to the prior owners. Except under circumstances where section 11-103-203 applies, the method of collection provided in this section shall be the sole method of collecting assessments. If an assessment is not paid within ninety days after the date of the order to levy or at such other date as may be specified in the order, but in no event less than thirty days, the commissioner may, with the approval of the banking board, proceed pursuant to part 8 of this article; however, for good cause shown to the banking board by the affected bank, the banking board may extend the ninety-day limit.

If the banking board determines that the capital or reserves of any bank are inadequate, the banking board may order the bank not to make new loans or discounts.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1082, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-203. Liability of shareholders.

The shareholders of every state bank shall be held individually responsible, equally and ratably, and not for another, for all contracts, debts, and engagements of said bank, to the extent of double the amount of their stock therein, at the par value thereof, in addition to the amount invested in such shares.

The term "shareholder" shall apply not only to such persons as appear on the books of the bank as shareholders, but also to every owner of stock, legal or equitable, although the stock may stand on such books in the name of another person, but not to a person who holds the stock as collateral security for the payment of a debt.

Any shareholder of any state bank who has transferred his or her shares or caused such transfer to appear on the books of the bank within sixty days immediately preceding the capital inadequacy of such bank, or who has made such transfer with knowledge of such impending capital inadequacy, shall be liable to the same extent that the transferee or subsequent transferee fails to meet such liability. This section shall not be construed to affect in any way any recourse that such shareholder might otherwise have against those in whose names such shares appear upon the books of the bank at the time of such capital inadequacy.

If the capital of any state bank becomes inadequate, and its assets and affairs have been taken possession of by the banking board pursuant to this code, and the banking board is of the opinion that it will become necessary in the course of liquidation of such bank to resort to the liability of the shareholders as provided for in this section, in order to make good the contracts, debts, or engagements of such bank, it shall be lawful for the banking board to file in the office of the county clerk and recorder of any county in this state, wherein any real estate belonging to any shareholder of such bank is situated, a statement in writing to the effect that such person is a stockholder of such bank (naming it) and that such bank is in process of liquidation, and stating the number of shares held by such shareholder and their aggregate par value and the extent of such shareholder's liability under this code.

Such statement shall be duly endorsed as filed by such county clerk and recorder, giving the date of filing, and shall be indexed with the name of the shareholder as grantor and the name of the bank as grantee, and shall be recorded as mortgages of real estate are required to be recorded, and from the date of filing of such statement the same shall be a lien upon any real estate of such shareholder located in such county.

If such shareholder thereafter deposits with the banking board an amount of money equal to double the amount of the par value of his or her shares, to be held by the banking board as security for the shareholder's liability under this section, then the banking board shall execute and file with such county clerk and recorder a release of such lien and, upon completing the liquidation of such bank, shall return to such shareholder any excess of such deposit, if such shareholder's ultimate liability shall prove to be less than the amount so deposited with the banking board; and in all cases where the liability of the shareholder has been satisfied, either as the result of litigation or otherwise, such liens so filed shall be released by the banking board. The expense of filing and recording such liens and releases thereof shall be paid out of any assets of the bank in the possession of the banking board.

The liability imposed by this section shall not extend to shareholders in any bank that has become a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation; but if any bank that has become a member of the federal deposit insurance corporation ceases to remain a member thereof, the double liability mentioned in this section shall extend to the shareholders in any such bank as provided in this section.

No stockholder of a state bank shall set off against his or her stockholder liability any claim he or she may have as a depositor in or creditor of any insolvent bank.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1082, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-105 as it existed prior to 2003.